Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
SELF-INSURANCE GROUPS

§386-191 Scope. This part shall apply
to workers' compensation self-insurance groups. This part shall not apply to
public employees or governmental entities. Groups which are issued a
certificate of approval by the insurance commissioner shall not be deemed to be
insurers or insurance companies and shall not be subject to the provisions of
the insurance laws and rules, except as otherwise provided in this part. [L
1986, c 304, pt of §1]

Cross References

Insurer's requirements; failure to maintain claims service
office; penalty; injunctions, see §386-124.5.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next